Nevada, session 83, SB486.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Nevada Promise Scholarship Account created by NRS
396.9645 the sum of $10,718,696.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Account for Pensions for Silicosis, Diseases Related to
Asbestos and Other Disabilities created by NRS 617.1675 the sum
of $1,000.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)